Indiana, session 2026, HB1176.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-17-3.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.136-2024,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.1. (a) This section:
(1) applies only to an operating referendum tax levy under
IC 20-46-1 approved by the voters before January 1, 2023, that is
imposed by a school corporation for taxes first due and payable in
2024 and 2025;
(2) does not apply to an operating referendum tax levy under
IC 20-46-1:
(A) approved by the voters during a time that the school
corporation imposing the levy was designated as a distressed
political subdivision; or
(B) approved by the voters after December 31, 2022, and
before January 1, 2025, that is imposed by a school
corporation for taxes first due and payable in 2024 or 2025;
and
(3) does not apply to any other tax year.
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


(b) As used in this section, "ADM" refers to the school corporation's
average daily membership used to determine the state tuition support
distribution under IC 20-43. In the case of a school corporation that has
entered into an agreement with one (1) or more charter schools to
participate as an innovation network charter school under IC 20-25.7-5,
the term includes the average daily membership of students described
in IC 20-25.7-5-2(b)(2) of any innovation network charter school that
is treated as a school operated by the school corporation with regard
to students described in IC 20-25.7-5-2(b)(2) when calculating the
total amount of state tuition support to be distributed to the school
corporation.
(c) Notwithstanding any increase in the assessed value of property
from the previous assessment date, for taxes first due and payable in
2024, the total amount of operating referendum tax that may be levied
by a school corporation may not exceed the lesser of:
(1) the maximum operating referendum tax that could have been
levied by the school corporation if the maximum referendum rate
was imposed for taxes first due and payable in 2023 multiplied by
one and three-hundredths (1.03); or
(2) the maximum operating referendum tax that could otherwise
be levied by the school corporation for taxes first due and payable
in 2024.
The tax rate for an operating referendum tax levy shall be decreased,
if necessary, to comply with this limitation.
(d) Notwithstanding any increase in the assessed value of property
from the previous assessment date, for taxes first due and payable in
2025, the total amount of operating referendum tax that may be levied
by a school corporation may not exceed the lesser of the following:
(1) The maximum operating referendum tax that could have been
levied by the school corporation if the maximum referendum rate
was imposed for taxes first due and payable in the immediately
preceding calendar year, as adjusted by this section, multiplied by
the result determined under STEP SEVEN of the following
formula:
STEP ONE: Subtract:
(i) the school corporation's spring count of ADM made in
the calendar year preceding by five (5) years the calendar
year in which the property taxes are first due and payable;
from
(ii) the school corporation's spring count of ADM made in
the immediately preceding calendar year.
STEP TWO: Divide the STEP ONE result by four (4).
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


STEP THREE: Divide the STEP TWO result by the school
corporation's spring count of ADM made in the calendar year
preceding by five (5) years the calendar year in which the
property taxes are first due and payable.
STEP FOUR: Multiply the STEP THREE amount by one and
five-tenths (1.5).
STEP FIVE: Add the STEP FOUR result and one and
six-hundredths (1.06).
STEP SIX: Determine the greater of the STEP FIVE result or
one and six-hundredths (1.06).
STEP SEVEN: Determine the lesser of the STEP SIX result or
one and twelve-hundredths (1.12).
(2) The maximum operating referendum tax that could otherwise
be levied by the school corporation for taxes first due and payable
in the current calendar year.
The tax rate for an operating referendum tax levy shall be decreased,
if necessary, to comply with this limitation.
(e) The department of education shall provide to the department of
local government finance each school corporation's applicable ADM
counts as needed to make the determinations under this section.
SECTION 2. IC 20-24-11-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) An existing public elementary or secondary
school may be converted into a charter school if the governing
body of the school corporation:
(1) votes to convert the school within the school corporation;
and
(2) submits to an authorizer a proposal described in
IC 20-24-3-4 to convert the school within the school
corporation to a charter school.
(b) The governing body of the school corporation described in
subsection (a) may not serve as the authorizer of the charter school
converted in accordance with this section.
(c) The organizer of a conversion charter school described in
this section may be:
(1) the school corporation; or
(2) a nonprofit corporation that:
(A) is established by the school corporation;
(B) is incorporated or registered in Indiana;
(C) has been recognized by the Internal Revenue Service to
be tax exempt and maintains such tax exempt status; and
(D) has an independent board whose members have been
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


elected or selected under the organizer's application and
that has entered into a contract under this article to
operate a charter school.
(d) The governing body of a school corporation may convert
more than one (1) existing public elementary or secondary school
within the school corporation under this section. The school
corporation or an organizer that is a nonprofit corporation
established by the school corporation under subsection (c)(2) may:
(1) submit a separate proposal for each school to an
authorizer; or
(2) with the approval of the authorizer, operate two (2) or
more schools under a single charter, provided that each
school site:
(A) is identified in the charter application and charter; and
(B) is subject to the performance conditions, accountability
measures, and renewal determinations established in the
charter.
(e) A conversion charter school described in this section shall
comply with the following:
(1) All legal requirements described in section 1(d) of this
chapter.
(2) Except as provided in this section, all requirements for
charter schools under this article.
SECTION 3. IC 20-25.7-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 169, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The A board may enter into
an agreement with an organizer to:
(1) reconstitute an eligible school as a participating innovation
network charter school; or to
(2) establish a participating innovation network charter school at
a location:
(A) selected by the board; within the boundary of the school
corporation. or
(B) within the geographic boundaries of any school
corporation with which the organizer enters into an
agreement under this chapter.
Notwithstanding IC 20-26-7.1, a participating innovation network
charter school may be established within a vacant school building.
(b) The terms of the agreement entered into between the a board of
a school corporation and an organizer must specify the following:
(1) A statement that the organizer authorizes the department to
include the charter school's performance assessment results under
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


IC 20-31-8 for students who reside within the geographic
boundaries of the school corporation when calculating the
school corporation's performance assessment under rules adopted
by the state board.
(2) Subject to an administrative fee as described in subsection (g),
a statement that the school corporation will distribute at least one
hundred percent (100%) of state tuition support dollars that the
school corporation receives from student enrollment for students
who:
(A) reside within the geographic boundaries of the school
corporation; and
(B) are enrolled in the participating innovation network
charter school;
in accordance with the school funding formula to the participating
innovation network charter school (if the participating innovation
network charter school is, with regard to students described in
this subsection, treated in the same manner as a school operated
by the school corporation under subsection (d)(2)).
(3) The performance goals and accountability metrics agreed
upon for the charter school in the charter agreement between the
organizer and the authorizer and a statement that the school
corporation is prohibited from setting additional performance
goals or accountability metrics.
(4) For an agreement entered into or renewed after June 30, 2023,
the process the board is required to follow in determining whether
to renew the agreement.
(5) The amount of money levied as property taxes that will be
distributed by the school corporation to the organizer.
(6) Subject to section 5 of this chapter, the participating
innovation network charter school's enrollment and discipline
policies, including defined attendance areas and enrollment
zones.
(7) A statement that the innovation agreement shall not create an
obligation that would cause the organizer to be in violation of its
charter agreement (as described in IC 20-24-1-3).
(c) If an organizer and the a board enter into an agreement under
subsection (a), the organizer and the board shall notify the department
that the agreement has been made under this section within thirty (30)
days after the agreement is entered into.
(d) Upon receipt of the notification under subsection (c), for school
years starting after the date of the agreement:
(1) the department shall include the participating innovation
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


network charter school's performance assessment results under
IC 20-31-8 for students who reside within the geographic
boundaries of the school corporation when calculating the
school corporation's performance assessment under rules adopted
by the state board;
(2) the department shall:
(A) treat the participating innovation network charter school
in the same manner as a school operated by the school
corporation with regard to students residing within the
geographic boundaries of the school corporation when
calculating the total amount of state funding to be distributed
to the school corporation unless subsection (e) applies; and
(B) in determining the school corporation's enrollment,
include only eligible pupils enrolled in the participating
innovation network charter school who reside within the
geographic boundaries of the school corporation.
(3) if requested by a participating innovation network charter
school that reconstitutes an eligible school, the department may
use student growth as the state board's exclusive means to
determine the innovation network charter school's category or
designation of school improvement under 511 IAC 6.2-10-10 for
a period of three (3) years. Beginning with the 2019-2020 school
year, the department may not use student growth as the state
board's exclusive means to determine an innovation network
charter school's category or designation of school improvement.
This subdivision expires July 1, 2023.
(e) If a participating innovation network school was established
before January 1, 2016, and for the current school year has a
complexity index that is greater than the complexity index for the
school corporation that the innovation network school has contracted
with, the innovation network school shall be treated as a charter school
for purposes of determining tuition support. This subsection expires
June 30, 2027.
(f) If the board or organizer fails to follow the process described in
subsection (b)(4), the board or organizer may appeal to the state board.
The state board shall hear the appeal in a public meeting and ensure
that the board or organizer follows the renewal process specified in the
agreement. The board may not terminate an agreement until the board
has provided evidence to the state board that the board has complied
with the renewal process specified in the agreement. The state board
shall issue a decision on an appeal under this subsection not later than
sixty (60) days after the date the board or organizer submitted the
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


appeal to the state board.
(g) If an administrative fee is included in an agreement entered into
or renewed under this chapter after June 30, 2023, 2026, under this
section, the fee may not exceed one percent (1%) of the total amount
of state tuition support that is distributed to the school corporation
based on the participating innovation network charter school's student
enrollment. each school corporation with which an organizer of a
participating innovation network charter school has entered into
an agreement may assess an administrative fee of not more than
one percent (1%) of the tuition support dollars that the school
corporation receives for students who:
(1) reside within the geographic boundaries of the school
corporation; and
(2) are enrolled in the participating innovation network
charter school.
(h) An agreement entered into between the board and an organizer
under this section may not be altered without written approval from the
organizer.
SECTION 4. IC 20-25.7-5-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. In addition to any state
tuition support dollars a participating innovation network charter
school receives from a school corporation under this chapter, the
department shall treat the participating innovation network
charter school as a charter school when calculating the tuition
support to be distributed to the innovation network charter school
for students of the innovation network charter school who do not
reside within the geographic boundaries of a school corporation
with which the innovation network charter school has an
agreement under this chapter.
SECTION 5. IC 20-25.7-5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.220-2021,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) IC 20-24-5-5 (with the exception of
IC 20-24-5-5(g)) does not apply to a participating innovation network
charter school that enters into an agreement with the board to
reconstitute or establish an eligible school.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), a participating
innovation network charter school must enroll any eligible student who
submits a timely application for enrollment.
(c) A participating innovation network charter school that
reconstitutes or establishes an eligible school may limit new
admissions to the participating innovation network charter school to:
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


(1) ensure that any student with legal settlement in the attendance
area, or in the school corporation any school corporation with
which the participating innovation network charter school has
entered into an agreement under this chapter if the school does
not have a defined attendance area, may attend the charter school;
(2) ensure that a student who attends the participating innovation
network charter school during a school year may continue to
attend the charter school in subsequent years;
(3) allow the siblings of a student alumnus or a current student
who attends the participating innovation network charter school
to attend the charter school;
(4) allow preschool students who attend a Level 3 or Level 4
Paths to QUALITY program preschool to attend kindergarten at
the participating innovation network charter school if the
participating innovation network charter school and the school
corporation or preschool provider have entered into an agreement
to share services or facilities;
(5) allow each student who qualifies for free or reduced price
lunch under the national school lunch program to receive
preference for admission to the participating innovation network
charter school if the preference is specifically provided for in the
charter and is approved by the authorizer; and
(6) allow each student who attended a turnaround academy or
attends a school that is located in the same school building as the
participating innovation network charter school to receive
preference for admission to the participating innovation network
charter school if the preference is specifically provided for in the
participating innovation network charter school's charter and is
approved by the authorizer of the participating innovation
network charter school.
(d) A participating innovation network charter school with a
curriculum that includes study in a foreign country may deny admission
to a student if:
(1) the student:
(A) has completed fewer than twenty-two (22) academic
credits required for graduation; and
(B) will be in the grade 11 cohort during the school year in
which the student seeks to enroll in the participating
innovation network charter school; or
(2) the student has been suspended (as defined in IC 20-33-8-7)
or expelled (as defined in IC 20-33-8-3) during the twelve (12)
months immediately preceding the student's application for
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


enrollment for:
(A) ten (10) or more school days;
(B) a violation under IC 20-33-8-16;
(C) causing physical injury to a student, a school employee, or
a visitor to the school; or
(D) a violation of a school corporation's drug or alcohol rules.
For purposes of subdivision (2)(A), student discipline received under
IC 20-33-8-25(b)(7) for a violation described in subdivision (2)(B)
through (2)(D) must be included in the calculation of the number of
school days that a student has been suspended.
(e) A participating innovation network charter school may give
enrollment preferences to children of the participating innovation
network charter school's founders, governing board members, and
participating innovation network charter school employees, as long as
the enrollment preference under this subsection is not given to more
than ten percent (10%) of the participating innovation charter school's
total population and there is sufficient capacity for a program, class,
grade level, or building to ensure that any student with legal settlement
in the attendance area may attend the school.
(f) This subsection applies to an existing charter school that enters
into an innovation network agreement with the a board. During the
charter school's first year of operation as a participating innovation
network charter school, the charter school may limit admission to:
(1) those students who were enrolled in the charter school on the
date it entered into the innovation network agreement; and
(2) siblings of students described in subdivision (1).
(g) This subsection applies if the number of applications for a
program, class, grade level, or building exceeds the capacity of the
program, class, grade level, or building. If a participating innovation
network charter school receives a greater number of applications than
there are spaces for students, each timely applicant must be given an
equal chance of admission. The participating innovation network
charter school that is not in a county containing a consolidated city
must determine which of the applicants will be admitted to the
participating innovation network charter school or the program, class,
grade level, or building by random drawing in a public meeting with
each timely applicant limited to one (1) entry in the drawing. However,
the participating innovation network charter school located in a county
with a consolidated city shall determine which of the applicants will be
admitted to the participating innovation network charter school or the
program, class, grade level, or building by using a publicly verifiable
random selection process.
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


SECTION 6. IC 20-25.7-5-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.162-2024,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Subject to an administrative fee as described
in section 2(g) of this chapter, a school corporation that enters into an
agreement with an organizer under this chapter shall distribute at least
one hundred percent (100%) of state tuition support dollars that the
school corporation receives from student enrollment students who:
(1) reside in the geographic boundaries of the school
corporation; and
(2) are enrolled in the participating innovation network charter
school;
in accordance with the school funding formula to the participating
innovation network charter school.
(b) Unless an agreement entered into before July 1, 2024, between
a board and an organizer provides otherwise, all participating
innovation network charter schools operating under existing
agreements with boards as of July 1, 2024, will receive funds as
required under subsection (a).
SECTION 7. IC 20-32-6.5-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.180-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year,
if a school determines that a student in kindergarten through grade 8 is
at risk of not achieving grade level proficiency in mathematics as
determined by an analysis of the student's data from:
(1) a grade level screener approved by the department; or
(2) a through-year statewide assessment;
the school must provide intervention that meets the requirements under
subsection (b).
(b) A school shall provide intervention to a student described in
subsection (a) that meets the following conditions:
(1) The intervention includes a multitiered system of support that
progresses from less to more intensive support based on the
student's individual needs.
(2) The intervention is aligned to daily Tier I instruction and
standard level learning progressions.
(3) The intervention is:
(A) targeted;
(B) differentiated; and
(C) supplemental to Tier I instruction.
(4) The intervention:
(A) is aligned with evidence based instructional strategies to
promote conceptual understanding, procedural fluency, and
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


real world problem solving; and
(B) allows a student opportunities to interact, show progress,
and demonstrate understanding through rigorous grade level
content.
(5) The intervention includes continual assessment and in depth
analysis of each student's data to inform the flexible movement in
and out of Tiers II and III.
(c) Not later than fifteen (15) days after a school makes a
determination under subsection (a) that a student is at risk, the
school shall provide notice to a parent of the student regarding the
determination. The notification may contain the following:
(1) Specific information about how the student is performing.
(2) Information about the intervention the student will receive
from the school.
(3) A list or description of any recommended resources
available for use at home to support the student's academic
growth in mathematics.
(c) (d) The department shall provide guidance on the multitiered
system that a school is required to provide under subsection (b).
SECTION 8. IC 20-43-13-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 197, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in
subsections (c) and (d), the complexity index is the percentage of the
school corporation's students who were receiving Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits, Temporary Assistance
for Needy Families (TANF) benefits, or foster care services as of
October 1 in the school year ending in the later of:
(1) 2025; or
(2) the first year of operation of the school corporation.
(b) For a conversion charter school, the percentage determined
under this section is the percentage of the sponsor school corporation.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), the complexity index for
a school corporation that has entered into an agreement with one (1) or
more charter schools to participate as an innovation network charter
school under IC 20-25.7-5 for a state fiscal year is equal to the result
using the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine:
(A) the school corporation's enrollment; minus
(B) the enrollment of students described in
IC 20-25.7-5-2(b)(2) of each participating innovation network
charter school.
STEP TWO: Determine the number of students in the school
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


corporation who were receiving Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits, Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families (TANF) benefits, or foster care services as of
October 1 in the school year ending in 2025, not including
students enrolled in each participating innovation network charter
school.
STEP THREE: Divide the result of STEP TWO by the result of
STEP ONE.
STEP FOUR: Determine the enrollment of students described in
IC 20-25.7-5-2(b)(2) of each participating innovation network
charter school.
STEP FIVE: Determine the number of students described in
IC 20-25.7-5-2(b)(2) in each participating innovation network
charter school who were receiving Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits, Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families (TANF) benefits, or foster care services as of
October 1 in the school year ending in the later of:
(A) 2025; or
(B) the first year of operation of the participating innovation
network charter school.
STEP SIX: Divide the result of STEP FIVE by the result of STEP
FOUR.
STEP SEVEN: For each participating innovation network charter
school, determine the greater of:
(A) the result of STEP THREE; or
(B) the result of STEP SIX.
STEP EIGHT: For each participating innovation network charter
school, multiply the result of STEP SEVEN by the result of STEP
FOUR.
STEP NINE: Determine the sum of:
(A) the result of STEP TWO; plus
(B) the results of STEP EIGHT, for each participating
innovation network charter school.
STEP TEN: Determine the sum of:
(A) the result of STEP ONE; plus
(B) the results of STEP FOUR for each participating
innovation network charter school.
STEP ELEVEN: Divide the STEP NINE result by the STEP TEN
result.
(d) If the complexity index of a participating innovation network
charter school that was established before January 1, 2016, is, for the
current school year, greater than the complexity index for the school
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


corporation with which the innovation network charter school has
contracted, the complexity index of the participating innovation
network charter school is determined as described in IC 20-25.7-5-2(e).
SECTION 9. IC 20-51.4-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 211, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) After June 30, 2022, a parent
of an eligible student or an emancipated eligible student may establish
an Indiana education scholarship account for the eligible student by
entering into a written agreement with the department on a form
prepared by the department. The department shall establish a date by
which an application to establish an ESA account for the upcoming
school year must be submitted. However, for a school year beginning
after July 1, 2022, applications must be submitted for an eligible
student not later than September 1 for the immediately following
school year. The ESA account of an eligible student shall be made in
the name of the eligible student. The department shall make the
agreement available on the website of the department. To be eligible,
a parent of an eligible student or an emancipated eligible student
wishing to participate in the ESA program must agree that:
(1) subject to subsection (i), a grant deposited in the eligible
student's ESA account under section 2 of this chapter and any
interest that may accrue in the ESA account will be used only for
the eligible student's ESA qualified expenses;
(2) if the eligible student participates in the CSA program, a grant
deposited in the eligible student's ESA account under
IC 20-51.4-4.5-3 and any interest that may accrue in the ESA
account will be used only for the eligible student's ESA qualified
expenses;
(3) money in the ESA account when the ESA account is
terminated reverts does not revert to the state general fund and
remains available to provide grants to eligible students under
this chapter;
(4) the parent of the eligible student or the emancipated eligible
student will use part of the money in the ESA account:
(A) for the eligible student's study in the subject of reading,
grammar, mathematics, social studies, or science; or
(B) for use in accordance with the eligible student's:
(i) individualized education program;
(ii) service plan developed under 511 IAC 7-34;
(iii) choice special education plan developed under 511
IAC 7-49; or
(iv) plan developed under Section 504 of the federal
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794;
(5) the eligible student will not be enrolled in a school that
receives tuition support under IC 20-43; and
(6) the eligible student will take the statewide summative
assessment, as applicable based on the eligible student's grade
level, as provided under IC 20-32-5.1, or the assessment specified
in the eligible student's:
(A) individualized education program developed under
IC 20-35;
(B) service plan developed under 511 IAC 7-34;
(C) choice special education plan developed under 511
IAC 7-49; or
(D) plan developed under Section 504 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(b) A parent of an eligible student may enter into a separate
agreement under subsection (a) for each child of the parent. However,
not more than one (1) ESA account may be established for each
eligible student.
(c) The ESA account must be established under subsection (a) by a
parent of an eligible student or an emancipated eligible student for a
school year on or before a date established by the department which
must be at least thirty (30) days before the fall count day of ADM
established under IC 20-43-4-3. A parent of an eligible student or an
emancipated eligible student may not enter into an agreement under
this section or maintain an ESA account under this chapter if the
eligible student receives a choice scholarship under IC 20-51-4 for the
same school year. An eligible student may not receive a grant under
section 2 of this chapter if the eligible student is currently included in
a school corporation's ADM count under IC 20-43-4.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f), an agreement
made under this section is valid for one (1) school year while the
eligible student is in kindergarten through grade 12 and may be
renewed annually. Upon graduation, or receipt of a certificate of
completion under the eligible student's individualized education
program, the eligible student's ESA account is terminated.
(e) An agreement entered into under this section terminates
automatically for an eligible student if:
(1) the eligible student no longer resides in Indiana while the
eligible student is eligible to receive grants under section 2 of this
chapter; or
(2) the ESA account is not renewed within three hundred
ninety-five (395) days after the date the ESA account was either
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


established or last renewed.
If an ESA account is terminated under this section, money in the
eligible student's ESA account, including any interest accrued, reverts
does not revert to the state general fund and remains available to
provide grants to eligible students under this chapter.
(f) An agreement made under this section for an eligible student
while the eligible student is in kindergarten through grade 12 may be
terminated before the end of the school year if the parent of the eligible
student or the emancipated eligible student notifies the department in
a manner specified by the department.
(g) A distribution made to an ESA account under section 2 of this
chapter is considered tax exempt as long as the distribution is used for
an ESA qualified expense. The amount is subtracted from the
definition of adjusted federal gross income under IC 6-3-1-3.5 to the
extent the distribution used for the ESA qualified expense is included
in the taxpayer's adjusted federal gross income under the Internal
Revenue Code.
(h) The department shall establish a student test number as
described in IC 20-19-3-9.4 for each eligible student.
(i) A student described in IC 20-51.4-2-4(3)(B) may not use the
money deposited into the eligible student's ESA account for ESA
qualified expenses described in IC 20-51.4-2-9(a)(3),
IC 20-51.4-2-9(a)(6), IC 20-51.4-2-9(a)(7), or IC 20-51.4-2-9(a)(9).
SECTION 10. IC 20-51.4-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 212, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) An eligible student who
currently maintains an ESA account is entitled to an ESA annual grant
amount for each school year until the student graduates or obtains a
certificate of completion under the student's individualized education
program. An eligible student may not receive a grant under this section
after graduating or obtaining a certificate of completion. The ESA
annual grant amount shall be paid from the ESA program fund. The
department shall deposit the ESA annual grant amount under this
section, in quarterly deposits, into an eligible student's ESA account.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), at the end of the year in
which an ESA account is established, the parent of an eligible student
or the emancipated eligible student may roll over for use in a
subsequent year a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
However, for each year thereafter, the parent of the eligible student or
the emancipated eligible student may roll over one thousand dollars
($1,000) plus any amount rolled over in a previous year.
(c) An eligible student's ESA account shall terminate the later of:
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


(1) the date the student graduates high school; or
(2) July 1 of the year in the year which the student graduates high
school.
Any money, including interest that remains in the eligible student's
ESA account when it terminates under this subsection reverts does not
revert to the state general fund and remains available to provide
grants to eligible students under this chapter.
SECTION 11. IC 20-51.4-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 213, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The Indiana education
scholarship account program fund is established for the purpose of
providing grants to eligible students under the ESA program. Money
appropriated to the fund may be used to provide grants under this
chapter in the manner prescribed in section 2 of this chapter.
(b) The department shall administer the ESA program fund.
(c) The ESA program fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations by the general assembly.
(2) Interest deposited in the ESA program fund under subsection
(d).
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest money in the ESA program
fund not currently needed to meet the obligations of the ESA program
fund in the same manner as other public money may be invested.
Interest that accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the
ESA program fund.
(e) Money in the ESA program fund at the end of a state fiscal year
reverts does not revert to the state general fund and remains in the
fund for the purposes of the fund.
SECTION 12. IC 20-51.4-4-3.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 214, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) The Indiana education
scholarship account administration fund is established for the purpose
of accepting money for the Indiana education scholarship account
program to support administration of the ESA program.
(b) The department shall administer the fund.
(c) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations by the general assembly.
(2) Interest deposited in the fund under subsection (d).
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year reverts does
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


not revert to the state general fund and remains in the fund for the
purposes of the fund.
SECTION 13. IC 20-51.4-4.5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 220, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) After June 30, 2023, a parent
of a career scholarship student or an emancipated career scholarship
student may establish a career scholarship account for the career
scholarship student by entering into a written agreement with the
department on a form prepared by the department. An application to
establish a CSA account, or an application to participate in the CSA
program with an ESA account, must be submitted not later than
October 1 for the school year. Subject to subsection (f), the CSA
account of a career scholarship student must be made in the name of
the career scholarship student. The department shall make the
agreement available on the website of the department.
(b) To be eligible to participate in the CSA program, a parent of a
career scholarship student or an emancipated career scholarship student
must agree that:
(1) a grant deposited in the career scholarship student's CSA
account under section 3 of this chapter and any interest that may
accrue in the CSA account will be used only for the CSA
qualified expenses;
(2) money in the CSA account when the CSA account is
terminated reverts does not revert to the state general fund and
remains available to provide grants to career scholarship
students under this chapter; and
(3) the parent of the career scholarship student or the emancipated
career scholarship student will use the money in the CSA account
for the career scholarship student to attend one (1) or more of the
sequences, courses, apprenticeships, or programs of study
designated and approved under section 6(a) of this chapter.
(c) A parent of a career scholarship student may enter into a
separate agreement under subsection (a) for each child of the parent.
However, not more than one (1) CSA account may be established for
each career scholarship student.
(d) Except as provided under subsection (f), a CSA account must be
established under subsection (a) by a parent of a career scholarship
student or an emancipated career scholarship student for a school year
not later than thirty (30) days after the date that the department
approves an application submitted under subsection (a).
(e) Except as provided in section 2 of this chapter, an agreement
made under this section is valid for one (1) school year while the career
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


scholarship student is in grades 10 through 12 and may be renewed
annually. Upon graduation, or receipt of:
(1) a certificate of completion under the career scholarship
student's individualized education program; or
(2) an Indiana high school equivalency diploma under
IC 22-4.1-18;
the career scholarship student's CSA account is terminated.
(f) If:
(1) a parent of a career scholarship student or an emancipated
career scholarship student enters into a written agreement with the
department on a form under subsection (a); and
(2) the career scholarship student participates in the ESA program
under this article;
the parent or emancipated career scholarship student must participate
in the CSA program using the student's ESA account instead of
establishing a CSA account. However, if the student ceases to
participate in the ESA program, the parent of the student or the
emancipated student must establish a CSA account to participate in the
CSA program.
SECTION 14. IC 20-51.4-4.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 221, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) An agreement entered into
under section 1 of this chapter terminates automatically for a career
scholarship student if:
(1) the career scholarship student no longer resides in Indiana
while the career scholarship student is eligible to receive grants
under section 3 of this chapter; or
(2) the CSA account is not renewed within three hundred
ninety-five (395) days after the date the CSA account was either
established or last renewed.
If a CSA account is terminated under this section, money in the career
scholarship student's CSA account, including any interest accrued,
reverts does not revert to the state general fund and remains
available to provide grants to career scholarship students under
this chapter.
(b) An agreement made under section 1 of this chapter for a career
scholarship student while the career scholarship student is in grades 10
through 12 may be terminated before the end of the school year if the
parent of the career scholarship student or the emancipated career
scholarship student notifies the department in a manner specified by
the department.
(c) A distribution made to a CSA account or ESA account, as
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


applicable, under section 3 of this chapter is considered tax exempt as
long as the distribution is used for:
(1) a CSA qualified expense; or
(2) an ESA qualified expense if the career scholarship student is
participating in the ESA program.
The amount is subtracted from the definition of "adjusted gross
income" under IC 6-3-1-3.5 to the extent the distribution used for the
CSA qualified expense or ESA qualified expense, as applicable, is
included in the taxpayer's adjusted federal gross income under the
Internal Revenue Code.
(d) If a career scholarship student does not have a student test
number, the department shall establish a student test number as
described in IC 20-19-3-9.4 for the career scholarship student. The
department shall provide the department information necessary for the
department to comply with this subsection.
SECTION 15. IC 20-51.4-4.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 222, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A career scholarship student
who currently maintains a CSA account or an ESA account and
participates in the CSA program is entitled to an annual grant amount
for each school year until the student:
(1) graduates; or
(2) obtains:
(A) a certificate of completion under the student's
individualized education program; or
(B) an Indiana high school equivalency diploma under
IC 22-4.1-18.
(b) A career scholarship student may not receive a grant under this
section after graduating, receiving an Indiana high school equivalency
diploma, or obtaining a certificate of completion. The CSA annual
grant amount shall be paid from the CSA program fund. The
department shall deposit the CSA annual grant amount under this
section, in quarterly deposits, into a career scholarship student's:
(1) CSA account; or
(2) ESA account if the student participates in the ESA program;
in a manner established by the department.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), at the end of the year in
which a CSA account is established, the parent of a career scholarship
student or the emancipated career scholarship student may roll over for
use in a subsequent year a maximum of one thousand dollars ($1,000).
However, for each year thereafter, the parent of the career scholarship
student or emancipated eligible student may roll over one thousand
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110


dollars ($1,000) plus any amount rolled over in a previous year.
(d) A career scholarship student's CSA account shall terminate the
later of:
(1) the date the student graduates high school or obtains an
Indiana high school equivalency diploma; or
(2) July 1 of the year in which the student graduates high school
or obtains an Indiana high school equivalency diploma.
Any money, including interest that remains in the career scholarship
student's CSA account when it terminates under this subsection, reverts
does not revert to the state general fund and remains available to
provide grants to career scholarship students under this chapter.
SECTION 16. IC 20-51.4-4.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 223, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The career scholarship
account program fund is established for the purpose of providing grants
to career scholarship students under the CSA program.
(b) The department shall administer the CSA program fund.
(c) The CSA program fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations by the general assembly.
(2) Interest deposited in the CSA program fund under subsection
(d).
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest money in the CSA program
fund not currently needed to meet the obligations of the CSA program
fund in the same manner as other public money may be invested.
Interest that accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the
CSA program fund.
(e) Money in the CSA program fund at the end of a state fiscal year
reverts does not revert to the state general fund and remains in the
fund for the purposes of the fund.
2026 IN 1176—LS 6675/DI 110